Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.230

Joint family court services.

(1) Any county may contract under chapter 39.34 RCW with any other county or counties to provide joint family court services.

(2) Any agreement between two or more counties for the operation of a joint family court service may provide that the treasurer of one participating county shall be the custodian of moneys made available for the purposes of the joint services, and that the treasurer may make payments from the moneys upon proper authorization.

(3) Any agreement between two or more counties for the operation of a joint family court service may also provide:

(a) For the joint provision or operation of services and facilities or for the provision or operation of services and facilities by one participating county under contract for the other participating counties;

(b) For appointments of members of the staff of the family court including the supervising counselor;

(c) That, for specified purposes, the members of the staff of the family court including the supervising counselor, but excluding the judges of the family court and other court personnel, shall be considered to be employees of one participating county;

(d) For other matters as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(4) The provisions of this chapter relating to family court services provided by a single county are equally applicable to counties which contract, under this section, to provide joint family court services.

[ 1986 c 95 s 3.]